Illinois, session 104th, HB3181.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 234 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/234)7    Sec. 234. Volunteer emergency workers.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92023 and beginning prior to January 1, 2028, each individual 10who (i) serves as a volunteer emergency worker for at least 9 11months during the taxable year and (ii) does not receive 12compensation for his or her services as a volunteer emergency 13worker of more than $5,000 for the taxable year may apply to 14the Department for a credit against the taxes imposed by 15subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201. The amount of the 16credit shall be $500 per eligible individual. If a taxpayer 17described in this subsection (a) is a volunteer member of a 18county or municipal emergency services and disaster agency 19under the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, then the 20taxpayer must serve as a volunteer emergency worker with the 21county or municipal emergency services and disaster agency for 22at least 100 hours during the taxable year. The aggregate 23amount of all tax credits awarded by the Department under this   HB3181- 2 -LRB104 08123 SPS 18169 b1Section in any calendar year may not exceed $5,000,000. 2Credits shall be awarded on a first-come first-served basis.3    (b) A credit under this Section may not reduce a 4taxpayer's liability to less than zero.5    (c) By January 24 of each year, the Office of the State 6Fire Marshal shall provide the Department of Revenue an 7electronic file with the names of volunteer emergency workers, 8other than volunteer emergency workers who are volunteer 9members of a county or municipal emergency services and 10disaster agency under the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 11Act, who (i) volunteered for at least 9 months during the 12immediately preceding calendar year, (ii) did not receive 13compensation for their services as a volunteer emergency 14worker of more than $5,000 during the immediately preceding 15calendar year, and (iii) are registered with the Office of the 16State Fire Marshal as of January 12 of the current year as 17meeting the requirements of items (i) and (ii) for the 18immediately preceding calendar year. The chief of the fire 19department, fire protection district, or fire protection 20association shall be responsible for notifying the State Fire 21Marshal of the volunteer emergency workers who met the 22requirements of items (i) and (ii) during the immediately 23preceding calendar year by January 12 of the current year. 24Notification shall be required in the format required by the 25State Fire Marshal. The chief of the fire department, fire 26protection district, or fire protection association shall be   HB3181- 3 -LRB104 08123 SPS 18169 b1responsible for the verification and accuracy of their 2submission to the State Fire Marshal under this subsection.3    By January 24, 2025, and by January 24 of each year 4thereafter, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 5Office of Homeland Security shall provide the Department of 6Revenue an electronic file with the names of volunteer 7emergency workers who (A) volunteered with a county or 8municipal emergency services and disaster agency pursuant to 9the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act for at least 9 10months during the immediately preceding calendar year, (B) did 11not receive compensation for their services as a volunteer 12emergency worker of more than $5,000 during the immediately 13preceding calendar year, (C) volunteered with a county or 14municipal emergency services and disaster agency pursuant to 15the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act for at least 100 16hours during the immediately preceding calendar year, and (D) 17are registered with the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 18and Office of Homeland Security as of January 12 of the current 19year as meeting the requirements of items (A), (B), and (C) for 20the immediately preceding calendar year. The coordinator of 21the emergency services and disaster agency shall be 22responsible for notifying the Illinois Emergency Management 23Agency and Office of Homeland Security of the volunteer 24emergency workers who met the requirements of items (A), (B), 25and (C) during the immediately preceding calendar year by 26January 12 of the current year. Notification shall be in the   HB3181- 4 -LRB104 08123 SPS 18169 b1format required by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 2and Office of Homeland Security. The coordinator of the 3emergency services and disaster agency shall be responsible 4for the verification and accuracy of their submission to the 5Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 6Security under this subsection. 7    (d) As used in this Section, "volunteer emergency worker" 8means a person who serves as a member, other than on a 9full-time career basis, of a fire department, fire protection 10district, or fire protection association that has a Fire 11Department Identification Number issued by the Office of the 12State Fire Marshal and who does not serve as a member on a 13full-time career basis for another fire department, fire 14protection district, fire protection association, or 15governmental entity. For taxable years beginning on or after 16January 1, 2024, "volunteer emergency worker" also means a 17person who is a volunteer member of a county or municipal 18emergency services and disaster agency pursuant to the 19Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. For taxable years 20beginning on or after January 1, 2026, "volunteer emergency 21worker" also means a community policing volunteer, a volunteer 22auxiliary police officer, or a volunteer auxiliary deputy. 23    (e) The Department shall adopt rules to implement and 24administer this Section, including rules concerning 25applications for the tax credit. 26(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.)   HB3181- 5 -LRB104 08123 SPS 18169 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.